Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 9. Prohibited Acts, Penalties, and Damages.
Sec. 46.03.823.
Hazardous substance response action contractors.

A person who is a response action contractor with respect to a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance other than oil whose acts or omissions are not contrary to a response plan or order by a state or federal agency having jurisdiction over the release or threatened release is not civilly liable for injuries, costs, damages, expenses, or other liability that results from the release or threatened release unless the release or threatened release is caused by an act or omission of the response action contractor that is negligent or grossly negligent or constitutes intentional misconduct. To show negligence by a response action contractor, a claimant must show that the acts or omissions of the contractor under the response action contract were not in accordance with generally accepted professional standards and practices at the time the response action services were performed.

The liability limitation under (a) of this section

does not apply to a response action contractor who would otherwise be liable for the release or threatened release under state or federal law even if that person had not carried out a response action with respect to the release or threatened release; and

does apply only to releases for which notification to the department was provided and received in the manner prescribed under state law.

The defense provided in AS

46.03.822(b)(1)(B)

is not available to a potentially liable person with respect to costs or damages caused by an act or omission of a response action contractor.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, this section does not affect the liability under this chapter or under any other state law of a person other than a response action contractor.

This section does not affect the liability of a response action contractor that may arise from the response action contractor’s failure to comply with the terms or conditions of a

response action contract or a remedial action plan if one has been approved by the department; or

contingency plan approved by the department where the response action contractor is the plan holder.

This section does not affect the liability of an employer who is a response action contractor with respect to an employee of the employer under any provision of law, including a law related to workers’ compensation.

In this section, “response action” means an action taken in connection with the mitigation or cleanup of a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance other than oil, including investigation, evaluation, plan development, mapping and surveying, engineering, design and construction, removal, and equipment provision.

History.

(§ 3 ch 39 SLA 1989; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 191 SLA 1990; am §§ 4, 6 ch 92 SLA 1991)

Sec. 46.03.824.
Damages.

Damages include but are not limited to injury to or loss of persons or property, real or personal, loss of income, loss of the means of producing income, or the loss of an economic benefit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 122 SLA 1972)

Sec. 46.03.825.
Oil spill response action contractors.

A response action contractor who responds to a release or threatened release of oil is not civilly liable for removal costs or damages that result from an act or omission in the course of providing care, assistance, or advice

consistent with a contingency plan

approved under AS

46.04.030

or

46.04.055

if the response action contractor is listed in the contingency plan; or

prepared under AS

46.04.200

,

46.04.210

, or 33 U.S.C. 1321(d) if the response action contractor is not listed in the contingency plan; or

as otherwise directed by the federal or state on-scene coordinator.

The limitation on liability contained in (a) of this section does not apply to

an action for personal injury or death; or

a response action contractor who

would otherwise have been liable for the release or threatened release under AS

46.03.822

;

acts with gross negligence or intentional misconduct; or

has agreed in writing to be listed as a primary response action contractor, who is listed as a primary response action contractor in a contingency plan approved under AS

46.04.030

or

46.04.055

, and who fails to respond to a release or threatened release of oil that the primary response action contractor was required to respond to under its contract with the applicable contingency plan holder; this subparagraph does not apply to a primary response action contractor if the failure to respond to a release or threatened release of oil results from a prior and ongoing response under another contingency plan approved under AS

46.04.030

or

46.04.055

in which the primary response action contractor has the primary duty to respond and a significant portion of the response action contractor’s oil spill cleanup equipment listed in the contingency plan approved under AS 46.04.030 or 46.04.055 is in use.

If the liability of an oil spill response action contractor is not limited under (a) of this section or if the provisions of (a) of this section do not apply because of (b) of this section, the oil spill response action contractor is not civilly liable for injuries, costs, damages, expenses, or other liability that results from the response action contractor’s act or omission with respect to a release or threatened release of oil unless the act or omission of the oil spill response action contractor is negligent, grossly negligent, or constitutes intentional misconduct. This subsection does not apply to an oil spill response action contractor who would have been liable for the initial release or threatened release of oil under AS

46.03.822

even if that contractor had not carried out a response action.

The defense provided in AS

46.03.822(b)(1)(B)

is not available to a potentially liable person with respect to costs or damages caused by an act or omission of a response action contractor.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, this section does not affect the liability under this chapter or under any other state law of a person other than a response action contractor.

Nothing in this section is intended to amend AS

46.04.030(l)

or

46.04.055

, or to create a cleanup or performance standard that must be met by a holder of a contingency plan or by a primary response action contractor.

In this section,

“consistent” means in substantial compliance with a contingency plan;

“primary response action contractor” has the meaning given in AS

46.04.035

;

“response action” means an action taken to respond to a release or threatened release of oil, including mitigation, clean up, marine salvage, incident management team services, response plan facilitator services, or removal of a release or threatened release of oil.

History.

(§ 8 ch 92 SLA 1991; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 83 SLA 1992; am § 18 ch 9 SLA 1994; am §§ 2 — 5 ch 8 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (d)-(f) enacted as (e)-(g).
Subsection (g) was formerly (d).
Relettered in 1992.

Administrative Code. —

For oil spill primary response action contractors and nontank vessel cleanup contractors, incident management teams, and response planning facilitators, see 18 AAC 75, art. 5.

Sec. 46.03.826.
Definitions for AS 46.03.822 — 46.03.828.

In AS

46.03.822

—

46.03.828

,

“act of God” means an act of nature which is unforeseeable in kind or degree;

“economic benefit” means a benefit measurable in economic terms, including but not limited to the gathering, catching, or killing of food or other items utilized in a subsistence economy and their replacement cost;

“facility”

includes a

building, structure, installation, equipment, well, pit, pond, lagoon, impoundment, ditch, landfill, storage container, motor vehicle, rolling stock, aircraft, or pipe or pipeline, including a pipe into a sewer or publicly-owned treatment works;

site or area at which a hazardous substance has been deposited, stored, disposed of, placed, or otherwise located;

does not include any consumer product in consumer use;

“having control over a hazardous substance” means producing, handling, storing, transporting, or refining a hazardous substance for commercial purposes immediately before entry of the hazardous substance into the atmosphere or in or upon the water, surface, or subsurface land of the state, and specifically includes bailees and carriers of a hazardous substance;

“hazardous substance” means

an element or compound which, when it enters into the atmosphere or in or upon the water or surface or subsurface land of the state, presents an imminent and substantial danger to the public health or welfare, including but not limited to fish, animals, vegetation, or any part of the natural habitat in which they are found;

oil; or

a substance defined as a hazardous substance under 42 U.S.C. 9601(14);

“natural resources” means land, fish, wildlife, biota, air, water, ground water, drinking water supplies, and other such resources belonging to, managed by, held in trust by, appertaining to, or otherwise controlled by the state or a municipality;

“oil” means a derivative of a liquid hydrocarbon and includes crude oil, lubricating oil, sludge, oil refuse or another petroleum-related product or by-product;

“owner” and “operator”

mean

in the case of a vessel, any person owning, operating, or chartering by demise, a vessel;

in the case of facility, any person owning or operating the facility;

in the case of an abandoned facility or vessel, any person who owned, operated, or otherwise controlled activities at the facility or vessel immediately before the abandonment; and

in the case of a facility or vessel, title or control of which was conveyed due to bankruptcy, foreclosure, tax delinquency, abandonment, or similar means to a unit of the state or a political subdivision of the state, any person who owned, operated, or otherwise controlled the facility or vessel immediately beforehand;

do not include a person who, without participating in the management of a vessel or facility, holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect that person’s security interest in the vessel or facility;

“release” means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, escaping, leaching, dumping, or disposing into the environment, including the abandonment or discarding of barrels, containers, and other closed receptacles containing any hazardous substance, but excluding

any release that results in exposure to persons solely within a workplace, with respect to a claim that those persons may assert against the persons’ employer; and

emissions from the engine exhaust of a motor vehicle, rolling stock, aircraft, or vessel;

“response action contract” means a written contract or agreement to provide response action with respect to a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance entered into by a person with

the department;

another person who has entered into an agreement with the department that provides for response action subject to the department’s oversight and control;

a federal agency with jurisdiction over the release or threatened release; or

another person potentially liable for the release or threatened release under state or federal law;

“response action contractor” means

a person who enters into a response action contract with respect to a release or threatened release of a hazardous substance and who is carrying out the contract, including a cooperative organization formed to maintain and supply response equipment and materials that enters into a response action contract relating to a release or threatened release;

a person who is retained or hired by and is under the control of a person described in (A) of this paragraph to provide services related to the response action contract; and

a person who acts as a volunteer and is engaged in a response action;

“subsistence economy” means an economy which utilizes on a regular basis an item which is owned in common by the people of the state, or the United States, including but not limited to fish, game, fur bearing animals, birds, timber or any part of the natural habitat for noncommercial purposes;

“transport” means the movement of a hazardous substance by any mode, including pipeline; in the case of a hazardous substance that has been accepted for transportation by a common or contract carrier, “transport” includes any stoppage in transit that is temporary, incidental to the transportation movement, and at the ordinary operating convenience of a common or contract carrier, and any stoppage of this type shall be considered as a continuity of movement and not as the storage of a hazardous substance;

“vessel” means every description of watercraft or other artificial contrivance that is used, or is capable of being used, as a means of transportation on water, or that carries hazardous substances for the purpose of incineration of the hazardous substances;

“water, surface or subsurface land of the state” means all water, surface or subsurface land within the territorial limits of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 122 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 7 SLA 1986; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 39 SLA 1989; am § 9 ch 92 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms and in 1989 and 1991 to maintain alphabetical order.

Sec. 46.03.828.
Other rights of action not affected.

The provisions of AS

46.03.822

—

46.03.828

do not abridge or alter a right of action or remedy under another statute, in equity, or at common law. However, an award of damages to a person or the state on a cause of action for an injury under AS

46.03.822

bars recovery in an action by another person or the state on the same cause of action for the same injury.

History.

(§ 1 ch 122 SLA 1972)

Sec. 46.03.830.
Proof of financial responsibility required for petrochemical facility or hazardous waste disposal site operation.

A person may not operate a petrochemical facility or a hazardous waste disposal site unless the person has furnished proof to the commissioner of financial ability to control a hazardous waste that will be used in, produced by, or disposed of at the facility or the site. Proof of financial responsibility shall include responsibility for the hazardous waste after the facility or site is closed, and may be demonstrated by self-insurance, insurance, surety, or guarantee, under regulations adopted by the department.

Acceptance of proof of financial responsibility under this section expires

one year from its issuance for self-insurance;

on the effective date of a change in the surety bond, guarantee, or insurance agreement; or

on the expiration or cancellation of the surety bond, guarantee, or insurance agreement.

History.

(§ 13 ch 93 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

Sec. 46.03.833.
Compliance with financial responsibility requirements.

A person whose proof of financial responsibility is accepted by the department under AS

46.03.830

or

46.03.100(f)

shall notify the department at least 90 days before the effective date of a change in, or expiration or cancellation of, the proof of financial responsibility. Application for renewal of acceptance of proof of financial responsibility under AS

46.03.830

or

46.03.100(f)

must be filed at least 90 days before the date of expiration.

The department, after notice and hearing, may revoke acceptance of proof of financial responsibility if it determines that

acceptance was procured by fraud or misrepresentation; or

a change of circumstance has occurred that warrants revocation under regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 13 ch 93 SLA 1981; am § 9 ch 136 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For treatment, storage, and disposal, see 18 AAC 62, art. 4.

For standards applicable to specific hazardous wastes and facilities, see 18 AAC 62, art. 5.

Sec. 46.03.840.
Radiation penalties.
[Repealed, § 12 ch 172 SLA 1978. For current provisions, see AS 18.60.475 — 18.60.545.]

Sec. 46.03.850.
Compliance order.

When, in the opinion of the department, a person is violating or is about to violate a provision of this chapter, AS 46.04, or AS 46.14, or a regulation or lawful order of the department, or a permit or certificate, or a term or condition of a permit or certificate issued by the department under this chapter, AS 46.04, AS 46.14, the department may notify the person of its determination by personal service or certified mail. The determination and notice do not constitute an order under AS

46.03.820

.

The recipient of the determination shall file with the department, within the time period specified in the notice, a report stating what measures have been and are being taken, or are proposed to be taken, to correct or control the conditions outlined in the notice.

After the report is filed under (b) of this section or the time period specified for it has elapsed, the department may issue a compliance order in conformity with the authority of the department and the public policy declared in AS

46.03.010

. A copy of the compliance order shall be served personally or sent by certified mail to the person affected. A compliance order is effective upon receipt.

Within 30 days after receipt the recipient may request a hearing to review the compliance order. Failure to request a hearing within 30 days after the receipt of a compliance order constitutes a waiver of the recipient’s right of review.

The department shall hold a hearing within 20 days after receipt of a request for one under (d) of this section. After the hearing the department may rescind, modify, or affirm the compliance order.

The attorney general shall seek enforcement of a compliance order.

History.

(§ 14 ch 220 SLA 1976; am § 9 ch 266 SLA 1976; am § 113 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 21 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

For waste disposal permit, see 18 AAC 60, art. 2.

For financial responsibility for oil discharges, see 18 AAC 75, art. 2.

For administrative penalties, see 18 AAC 80, art. 12.

For compliance orders, see 18 AAC 95, art. 1.

For definitions, see 18 AAC 95, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

Modern status of rules as to balance of convenience or social utility as affecting relief from nuisance. 40 ALR3d 601.

Sufficiency of evidence of violation in administrative proceeding terminating in abatement order. 48 ALR3d 795.